Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVI Motor Vehicles
CHAPTER 189 Traffic Regulations — Vehicle Equipment and Storage
189.635.
Vehicle accident reports by operators, law enforcement officers, and agencies — Availability — News-gathering organizations — Contracts with outside entities to provide vehicle’s accident history and electronic access to reports — Administrative regulations — Insurers of train engineers.

The Justice and Public Safety Cabinet, Department of Kentucky State Police, shall be responsible for maintaining a reporting system for all vehicle accidents which occur within the Commonwealth. Such accident reports shall be utilized for such purposes as will improve the traffic safety program in the Commonwealth involving the collection, processing, storing, and dissemination of such data and the establishment of procedures by administrative regulations to ensure that uniform definitions, classifications, and other federal requirements are in compliance.

Any person operating a vehicle on the highways of this state who is involved in an accident resulting in fatal or nonfatal personal injury to any person or damage to the vehicle rendering the vehicle inoperable shall be required to immediately notify a law enforcement officer having jurisdiction. In the event the operator fails to notify or is incapable of notifying a law enforcement officer having jurisdiction, such responsibility shall rest with the owner of the vehicle or any occupant of the vehicle at the time of the accident. A law enforcement officer having jurisdiction shall investigate the accident and file a written report of the accident with his or her law enforcement agency.

Every law enforcement agency whose officers investigate a vehicle accident of which a report must be made as required in this chapter shall file a report of the accident with the Department of Kentucky State Police within ten (10) days after investigation of the accident upon forms supplied by the department.

Any person operating a vehicle on the highways of this state who is involved in an accident resulting in any property damage exceeding five hundred dollars ($500) in which an investigation is not conducted by a law enforcement officer shall file a written report of the accident with the Department of Kentucky State Police within ten (10) days of occurrence of the accident upon forms provided by the department.

All accident reports filed with the Department of Kentucky State Police in compliance with subsection (4) of this section shall not be considered open records under KRS

61.870

to

61.884

and shall remain confidential, except that the department may:

Disclose the identity of a person involved in an accident when his or her identity is not otherwise known or when he or she denies his or her presence at an accident; and

Make the reports available:

To the persons named in paragraph (c) of this subsection; and

In accordance with subsection (8) of this section.

All other accident reports required by this section, and the information contained in the reports, shall be confidential and exempt from public disclosure under KRS

61.870

to

61.884

, except when:

Produced pursuant to a properly executed subpoena or court order; or

Disclosed as provided in this section.

Accident reports shall be made available to:

The parties to the accident;

The parents or guardians of a minor who is party to the accident;

Insurers or their written designee for insurance business purposes of any party who is the subject of the report;

The attorneys of the parties to the accident;

Any party to litigation who files with the department a request for the report and includes a copy of the first page of a District or Circuit Court clerk-stamped complaint naming all parties; and

The Department of Workplace Standards in the Education and Labor Cabinet if the accident report is pertinent to an occupational safety and health investigation.

Except as provided for in paragraph (b) of this subsection, the department shall not release accident reports for a commercial purpose.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the department may, as a matter of public safety, contract with an outside entity and release unredacted vehicle damage data extracted from accident reports to the entity if the data is used solely for the purpose of providing the public a means of determining a vehicle’s accident history. The department may further contract with a third party to provide electronic access to reports for persons and entities who are entitled to the reports under subsection (5) of this section.

The department shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to set out a fee schedule for accident reports made available pursuant to subsections (5) and (8) of this section. These fees shall be in addition to those charged to the public for records produced under KRS Chapter 61.

The report shall be made available to a news-gathering organization, solely for the purpose of publishing or broadcasting the news. The news-gathering organization shall not use or distribute the report, or knowingly allow its use or distribution, for a commercial purpose other than the news-gathering organization’s publication or broadcasting of the information in the report.

For the purposes of this subsection:

“News-gathering organization” includes:

A newspaper or periodical if it:

Is published at least fifty (50) of fifty-two (52) weeks during a calendar year;

Contains at least twenty-five percent (25%) news content in each issue or no more than seventy-five percent (75%) advertising content in any issue in the calendar year; and

Contains news of general interest to its readers that can include news stories, editorials, sports, weddings, births, and death notices;

A television or radio station with a valid broadcast license issued by the Federal Communications Commission;

A news organization that broadcasts over a multichannel video programming service as defined in KRS

136.602

;

A Web site published by or affiliated with any entity described in subdivision a., b., or c. of this subparagraph;

An online-only newspaper or magazine that publishes news or opinion of interest to a general audience and is not affiliated with any entity described in subparagraph 2. of this paragraph; and

Any other entity that publishes news content by any means to the general public or to members of a particular profession or occupational group; and

“News-gathering organization” does not include any product or publication with the primary purpose of distributing advertising or of publishing names and other personal identifying information concerning parties to motor vehicle accidents which may be used to solicit for services covered under Subtitle 39 of KRS Chapter 304.

A news-gathering organization shall not be held to have used or knowingly allowed the use of the report for a commercial purpose merely because of its publication or broadcast.

A request under this subsection shall be completed using a form promulgated by the department through administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A. The form under this paragraph shall include:

The name and address of the requestor and the news-gathering organization the requestor represents;

A statement that the requestor is a news-gathering organization under this subsection and identifying the specific subdivision of paragraph (b)1. of this subsection under which the requester qualifies;

A statement that the request is in compliance with the criteria contained in this section; and

A declaration of the requestor as to the accuracy and truthfulness of the information provided in the request.

The department shall redact all personal information from a report prior to making it available to a news-gathering organization as defined under paragraph (b)1.f. of this subsection.

Reports may be provided to news-gathering organizations as defined under paragraph (b)1.a. to e. of this subsection without redaction.

For the purposes of this paragraph, “personal information” means:

The address, driver’s license number, phone number, date of birth, and any other contact information contained in the report for each person listed on the report; and

The vehicle identification numbers (VINs) for each vehicle listed on the report.

The motor vehicle insurers of any train engineer or other train crew member involved in an accident on a railroad while functioning in their professional capacity shall be prohibited from obtaining a copy of any accident report filed on the accident under this section without written consent from the individual the company insures. Insurance companies issuing motor vehicle policies in the Commonwealth shall be prohibited from raising a policyholder’s rates solely because the policyholder, in his or her professional capacity, is a train engineer or other train crew member involved in an accident on a railroad.

For reporting and statistical purposes, motor scooters and autocycles as defined in KRS

186.010

shall be listed as a distinct category and shall not be considered to be a motor vehicle or a motorcycle for reports issued under this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 335, § 1; 1976, ch. 194, § 1, effective January 1, 1977; 1990, ch. 94, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 478, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 2000, ch. 497, § 2, effective July 14, 2000; 2007, ch. 85, § 211, effective June 26, 2007; 2008, ch. 160, § 1, effective July 15, 2008; 2019 ch. 22, § 9, effective June 27, 2019; 2019 ch. 143, § 3, effective June 27, 2019; 2022 ch. 236, § 93, effective July 1, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/15/2008). The numbering of the subsections in this section has been altered by the Reviser of Statutes from the numbering in 2008 Ky. Acts ch. 160, sec. 1, under the authority of KRS

7.136

.

189.636.
Accident or traffic violation involving uninsured motor vehicle.

If, in the investigation of any motor vehicle accident or traffic violation it appears that any vehicle involved therein is uninsured, the law enforcement officer making the investigation shall issue a citation to the owner of the vehicle requiring such owner to appear in a court of proper jurisdiction for violation of KRS

304.39-110

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 36, § 8; 1978, ch. 384, § 53, effective June 17, 1978.

189.640.
Enforcement of highway and motor vehicle laws. [Repealed.]

189.641.
Definitions. [Repealed.]

189.643.
Unsafe motor vehicle may not be operated. [Repealed.]

189.645.
Annual inspection — Time for repairs — Registration suspended, when — Foreign inspections. [Repealed.]

189.647.
Certificate of inspection, when issued — Fee — Display. [Repealed.]

189.650.
Arrests and bail for violation of motor vehicle laws. [Repealed.]

189.651.
Counterfeiting certificates — Possession unlawful — Permit not transferable — Display. [Repealed.]

189.653.
Official inspection station permits, application — Annual fee — Inspection of stations — Fees in revolving fund. [Repealed.]

189.655.
False advertising as official inspection station — Who may issue certificates. [Repealed.]

189.657.
Extension of time for inspections — Rules and regulations. [Repealed.]

189.659.
Permits for commercial vehicle operators — Vehicles exempted. [Repealed.]

189.660.
Right of action unabridged. [Repealed.]

189.670.
Public policy as to trucks declared.

It is hereby declared to be the public policy of this state that heavy motor trucks, alone or in combination with other vehicles, increase the cost of highway construction and maintenance, interfere with and limit the use of highways for normal traffic thereon, and endanger the safety and lives of the traveling public, and that the regulations embodied in this chapter with respect to motor trucks, semitrailer trucks and semitrailers are necessary to achieve economy in highway costs, and to permit the highways to be used freely and safely by the traveling public.

History.

2739g-101.

189.700.
Declaration of policy concerning parking lots and automobile storage garages.

It is declared that the operation of automobile parking lots or automobile storage garages, wherein automobiles are parked or stored for hire, is a business impressed with the public interest. It is further declared that any contract purporting to limit the liability of the operator of such a lot or garage, for loss of or damage to an automobile parked for hire, or its contents, except liability for damage by the elements or by physical forces beyond the control of the operator and his employees, is against public policy.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 154, § 1, effective June 17, 1954.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Automobile parking lots and storage garages where automobiles are parked or stored for hire are exempted from the provisions of KRS

189.010

and a peace officer could not cite a person for a moving violation or an equipment violation which occurred within such facilities but an officer would nevertheless have the authority to pursue a violator into such facilities for a violation which occurred outside.

OAG 75-36

.

189.705.
Posting of notice of hours facility is open — Attendant required — Exceptions.

Every parking lot or storage garage, wherein automobiles are stored or kept for hire, shall post clearly the hours during which said parking facility is open for business. It shall be the duty of every such operator of a parking lot or garage to keep an attendant on duty during the posted hours of operation of such parking facility, unless the entrance to said parking lot or garage is controlled by a mechanically operated gate, door or other entrance device which is operated by the customer or unless the parking lot is operated on an honor system which requires no attendant, or by a system of meters at each individual stall. This section shall not apply to operators who lease a specific space to a customer for a period of a month or longer at a time.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 154, § 2, effective June 17, 1954.

189.710.
Liability of parking lot or storage garage operator.

Every operator of an automobile parking lot or storage garage who takes possession of the customer’s automobile and requires keys to be left with the automobile or the employees of such parking lot or garage, shall be liable as bailee for hire and shall be obligated to safely keep and return such automobiles so parked or stored and shall be liable for any loss or damage to such automobiles except such as is caused by persons or forces beyond the control of the operator and his employees. The liability shall expressly include liability for theft, and for damage resulting from collision of any type on the lot or in the garage where the event is in the control of or should be in the control of the operator and his employees.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 154, § 3, effective June 17, 1954.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Kentucky Law Survey, Peltier and Coleman, Commercial Law, 67 Ky. L.J. 523 (1978-79).

Treatises

Kentucky Instructions To Juries (Civil), 5th Ed., Bailments, § 34.01.

189.715.
Checking of personal articles other than automobile equipment — Posting of notice.

The customer may contract to check personal articles, not properly the equipment of an automobile, by obtaining an additional check for such articles. All parking lots and garages which park or store automobiles for hire and assume to act as bailees for said automobile shall post a sign of not less than twenty-four (24) inches by thirty-six (36) inches having bold lettering bearing the inscription “Responsible for Contents Only if Checked Separately.” The sign shall be placed in a conspicuous place at or near the entrance of the parking lot or storage garage, at or near the eye level of a motorist seated in an automobile, and shall be well-lighted at all times while the parking facility is opened for business.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 154, § 4, effective June 17, 1954.

189.720.
Contracts limiting liability are void.

Any contract which purports to limit in any way the common law liability of the parking operator or his liability under KRS

189.700

to

189.720

shall be totally void and of no effect.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 154, § 5, effective June 17, 1954.

189.725.
Removal of vehicles by owner of private parking lot — Signs.

Any owner or attendant of a privately owned parking lot may have a towing company remove from the lot any unauthorized parked vehicle. A towing company engaged to remove such vehicle shall have a lien on the vehicle in accordance with KRS

376.275

.

Every operator of a parking lot covered by subsection (1) of this section shall post signs stating thereon that the parking lot is privately owned and unauthorized vehicles will be towed away at the owner’s expense.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 96, §§ 1, 2; 2021 ch. 74, § 13, effective June 29, 2021.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Only the owner or attendant of a privately owned lot has the authority to order the removal of an unauthorized vehicle; this section neither gives carte blanche authority to a towing service to remove vehicles at its discretion nor does the statute give the owner or attendant the authority to delegate this discretion to a third party.

OAG 83-296

.

189.730.
Vehicles required to be inspected or repaired when — Operation prohibited when — Duty of owner. [Repealed.]

189.740.
Issuance of form falsely certifying that repairs have been made prohibited. [Repealed.]

189.750.
Abandonment of motor vehicle on highway property — Removal — Disposition. [Repealed.]

189.751.
Abandonment of vehicle on county road or city street — Penalty — Removal — Disposition.

Any person who leaves a vehicle upon a county road or city street under circumstances indicating an abandonment, shall be fined not less than twenty-five dollars ($25) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100), or imprisoned for not less than ten (10) days nor more than thirty (30) days. A vehicle left upon a county road or city street for three (3) consecutive days shall be presumed to be abandoned.

The public authority having jurisdiction over a particular county road or city street shall cause a vehicle that is presumed to be abandoned under subsection (1) of this section and that is fit for future use to be removed by some person engaged in the business of storing or towing motor vehicles and the provisions of KRS

376.275

shall apply in disposing of the vehicle. Any money obtained in disposing of a vehicle that is in excess of any liens shall be paid by the seller to the owner and if the owner cannot be located, the excess money shall escheat to the state pursuant to the provisions of KRS Chapter 393. A vehicle shall be registered or transferred in the county where the sale is conducted upon an affidavit by the seller that the provisions of KRS

376.275

have been met. The affidavit shall contain information as prescribed by the transportation cabinet.

If a vehicle that is presumed abandoned under subsection (1) of this section is, in the opinion of the public authority, unfit for future use, the public authority may dispose of it immediately in a manner as it deems appropriate.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 105, §§ 1 to 3; 1972, ch. 299, § 3; 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 20(9); 1998, ch. 179, § 1, effective July 15, 1998.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Police officers are advised to obtain a warrant against a property owner before going on his property to remove a junked vehicle which he has allowed to remain on his property in violation of a local ordinance, even though the vehicle can be readily observed without going upon the private property.

OAG 71-192

.

A city has no legal interest in an abandoned vehicle other than to have it removed and stored, or disposed of where it is found to be unfit for future use pursuant to subsection (3) of this section; of course, the city can purchase the vehicle at a sale pursuant to KRS

376.275

.

OAG 78-254

.

189.752.
Definitions for KRS 189.753.

“State highway” means any public road maintained by the State Department of Highways.

“Motor vehicle” means any vehicle propelled by an internal combustion engine capable of transporting persons or property. Motor vehicle shall not mean “moped” as defined in KRS

189.285

.

“Abandoned vehicle” means any motor vehicle that is left upon the right-of-way of a state highway for three (3) days, whether or not it is fit for future use.

“Owner” means the last registered owner.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 299, § 1; 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 20(1); 1978, ch. 349, § 9, effective June 17, 1978; 1986, ch. 322, § 2, effective July 15, 1986; 1998, ch. 179, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 2006, ch. 173, § 23, effective April 5, 2006.

189.753.
Abandonment of motor vehicle on state highway — Presumption — Notification — Removal.

Any motor vehicle left upon the right-of-way of a state highway for three (3) consecutive days shall be presumed an abandoned vehicle.

The Department of Kentucky State Police shall locate abandoned vehicles on the right-of-way of state highways. Upon determination that a vehicle is abandoned, and notwithstanding the provisions of KRS

189.450

, the Department of Kentucky State Police may order any person engaged in the business of storing or towing motor vehicles to remove the abandoned vehicle to a site chosen by the person. The department shall determine, if possible, the ownership of the vehicle through the abandoned vehicle’s license plates, serial number, or other methods of determining ownership. As soon as practicable, the owner shall be notified by mail, whether he or she is a Kentucky resident or a resident of another state, that the abandoned vehicle was illegally upon public property; the name and the address where the storage facility is located; that removal of the vehicle from the storage facility will involve payment of towing and storage charges; and that the vehicle may be sold pursuant to provisions of KRS

376.275

if not claimed within sixty (60) days. A notification shall not be required if ownership cannot be determined. In the event of such sale, the state shall receive any proceeds after the satisfaction of all liens placed on the vehicle.

The commissioner of the Department of Kentucky State Police shall promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A to carry out the provisions of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 299, § 2; 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 20(1), (7); 1986, ch. 322, § 3, effective July 15, 1986; 1998, ch. 179, § 3, effective July 15, 1998; 2007, ch. 85, § 212, effective June 26, 2007.

189.754.
Removal of injurious substance from highway.

Any person removing a wrecked or damaged vehicle from a highway shall remove any glass or other injurious substance dropped upon the highway from such vehicle.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 49, § 5, effective July 15, 1980.